Illinois, session 104th, SB2784.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Circuit Courts Act is amended by changing 5Sections 2f-2 and 2f-14 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 35/2f-2)7    Sec. 2f-2. 19th judicial circuit; subcircuits; additional 8judges. 9    (a) Prior to December 5, 2022, the 19th circuit shall be 10divided into 6 subcircuits. The subcircuits shall be compact, 11contiguous, and substantially equal in population. The General 12Assembly by law shall create the subcircuits, using population 13data as determined by the 2000 federal census, and shall 14determine a numerical order for the 6 subcircuits. That 15numerical order shall be the basis for the order in which 16resident judgeships are assigned to the subcircuits. The 6 17resident judgeships to be assigned that are not added by or 18converted from at-large judgeships as provided in this 19amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly shall be assigned 20to the 1st, 2nd, 3rd, 4th, 5th, and 6th subcircuits, in that 21order. The 6 resident judgeships to be assigned that are added 22by or converted from at-large judgeships as provided in this 23amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly shall be assigned   SB2784 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 16465 JRC 29858 b1to the 6th, 5th, 4th, 3rd, 2nd, and 1st subcircuits, in that 2order. Once a resident judgeship is assigned to a subcircuit, 3it shall continue to be assigned to that subcircuit for all 4purposes; provided that a resident judge elected from a 5subcircuit seeking retention shall run for retention at large 6in the circuit in accordance with Article VI, Section 12(d) of 7the Illinois Constitution.8    (a-3) On and after December 5, 2022, the 19th circuit is 9divided into 12 subcircuits. Beginning in 2031, the General 10Assembly shall, in the year following each federal decennial 11census, redraw the boundaries of the subcircuits to reflect 12the results of the most recent federal decennial census. The 13subcircuits shall be compact, contiguous, and substantially 14equal in population. Once a judgeship is assigned to a 15subcircuit or an at-large judgeship is converted to a resident 16judgeship and assigned to a subcircuit, it shall be assigned 17to that subcircuit for all purposes; provided that a resident 18judge elected from a subcircuit seeking retention shall run 19for retention at large in the circuit in accordance with 20Article VI, Section 12(d) of the Illinois Constitution. Any 21vacancy in a resident judgeship existing on or occurring after 22the effective date of a law redrawing the boundaries of the 23subcircuits shall be filled by election by a resident of the 24redrawn subcircuit. When a vacancy occurs in a resident 25judgeship, the resident judgeship shall be allotted by the 26Supreme Court under subsection (c) and filled by election.   SB2784 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 16465 JRC 29858 b1    (a-5) Of the at-large judgeships of the 19th judicial 2circuit, the first 3 that are or become vacant on or after the 3effective date of this amendatory Act of the 96th General 4Assembly shall become resident judgeships of the 19th judicial 5circuit to be allotted by the Supreme Court under subsection 6(c) and filled by election, except that the Supreme Court may 7fill those judgeships by appointment for any remainder of a 8vacated term until the resident judgeships are filled 9initially by election. As used in this subsection, a vacancy 10does not include the expiration of a term of an at-large judge 11who seeks retention in that office at the next term.12    (a-10) The 19th judicial circuit shall have 3 additional 13resident judgeships to be allotted by the Supreme Court under 14subsection (c). One of the additional resident judgeships 15shall be filled by election beginning at the 2010 general 16election. Two of the additional resident judgeships shall be 17filled by election beginning at the 2012 general election. 18    (a-15) On and after January 7, 2022, each at-large 19judgeship of the 19th judicial circuit existing on January 7, 202022 shall be converted to a resident judgeship as it is or 21becomes vacant and shall be allotted by the Supreme Court 22according to subsection (c) of this Section. It is the intent 23of the General Assembly not to create any additional 24judgeships in the 19th judicial circuit by this amendatory Act 25of the 102nd General Assembly. Notwithstanding any other 26provision of law to the contrary, the conversion of at-large   SB2784 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 16465 JRC 29858 b1judgeships to resident judgeships under this subsection shall 2not entitle the 19th judicial circuit to any additional 3circuit judgeships elected at-large.4    (a-20) Any judgeship that became vacant after January 1, 52020 and on June 1, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 6102-380) is held by an individual appointed by the Supreme 7Court also shall be filled by election at the 2022 general 8election. 9    (b) Prior to December 5, 2022, the 19th circuit shall have 10a total of 12 resident judgeships (6 resident judgeships 11existing on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 1296th General Assembly, 3 formerly at-large judgeships as 13provided in subsection (a-5), and 3 resident judgeships added 14by subsection (a-10)). The number of resident judgeships 15allotted to subcircuits of the 19th judicial circuit pursuant 16to this Section shall constitute all the resident judgeships 17of the 19th judicial circuit. 18    (c) Prior to January 7, 2022 (the effective date of Public 19Act 102-693), the Supreme Court shall allot (i) all vacancies 20in resident judgeships of the 19th circuit existing on or 21occurring on or after the effective date of this amendatory 22Act of the 93rd General Assembly and not filled at the 2004 23general election, (ii) the resident judgeships of the 19th 24circuit filled at the 2004 general election as those 25judgeships thereafter become vacant, (iii) the 3 formerly 26at-large judgeships described in subsection (a-5) as they   SB2784 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 16465 JRC 29858 b1become available, (iv) the 3 resident judgeships added by 2subsection (a-10), and (v) the additional resident judgeships 3provided for by subsection (a-3), for election from the 4various subcircuits until there are 2 resident judges to be 5elected from each subcircuit. On and after January 7, 2022, 6the Supreme Court shall allot all vacancies in the 16 15 7resident judgeships of the 19th circuit (the 13 12 resident 8judgeships existing on January 7, 2022 and the 3 formerly 9at-large judgeships converted under subsection (a-15)) for 10election from the various subcircuits created by Public Act 11102-693 in numerical order until there is one resident judge 12to be elected from each subcircuit, except the 1st, 2nd, and 133rd, and 4th subcircuits which shall have 2 resident judges 14each; provided that the first vacancy shall be allotted to the 1512th subcircuit, that the second vacancy shall be allotted to 16the 3rd subcircuit, that the third vacancy shall be allotted 17to the 4th subcircuit, that the fourth vacancy shall be 18allotted to the 2nd subcircuit, that the fifth vacancy shall 19be allotted to the 1st subcircuit, and the sixth vacancy shall 20be allotted to the 3rd subcircuit. Following these allotments, 21judicial vacancies shall be allotted in numerical order 22starting with the 5th subcircuit. No resident judge of the 2319th circuit serving on January 7, 2022 shall be required to 24change his or her residency in order to continue serving in 25office or to seek retention in office as resident judgeships 26are allotted by the Supreme Court in accordance with this   SB2784 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 16465 JRC 29858 b1Section.2    (c-5) If 2 or more judgeships in the same subcircuit are to 3be filled at the same election under this Section, the State 4Board of Elections shall designate those vacancies 5alphabetically. 6    (d) A resident judge elected from a subcircuit shall 7continue to reside in that subcircuit as long as he or she 8holds that office. A resident judge elected from a subcircuit 9after January 1, 2008, must retain residency as a registered 10voter in the subcircuit to run for retention from the circuit 11at-large thereafter. 12    (e) Vacancies in resident judgeships of the 19th circuit 13shall be filled in the manner provided in Article VI of the 14Illinois Constitution.15(Source: P.A. 101-477, eff. 6-1-20; 102-380, eff. 8-13-21; 16102-668, eff. 11-15-21; 102-693, eff. 1-7-22; 102-1126, eff. 172-10-23.) 18    (705 ILCS 35/2f-14)19    Sec. 2f-14. 6th judicial circuit; resident judgeships.20    (a) The at-large judgeships of the 6th judicial circuit 21existing on January 7, 2022 shall be converted to resident 22judgeships as provided in this subsection as those judgeships 23are or become vacant. When a vacancy occurs in an at-large 24judgeship of the 6th judicial circuit, the at-large judgeship 25shall be converted to a resident judgeship for either   SB2784 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 16465 JRC 29858 b1Champaign County or Macon County, depending on which of those 22 counties the incumbent at-large circuit judge resided in 3when the incumbent judge was elected. The first 3 that become 4vacant after January 7, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 5102-693) shall be converted to resident judgeships elected 6from Champaign County. The remaining two at-large judgeships 7that become vacant shall be converted to resident judgeships 8elected from Macon County. Thereafter, persons elected to 9those resident judgeships shall be residents of the county 10which elects them.11    (b) It is the intent of the General Assembly not to create 12any additional judgeships in the 6th judicial circuit by 13Public Act 102-693 and this amendatory Act of the 102nd 14General Assembly. Notwithstanding any other provision of law 15to the contrary, the conversion of at-large judgeships to 16resident judgeships under subsection (a) of this Section shall 17not entitle the 6th judicial circuit to any additional circuit 18judgeships elected at-large.19(Source: P.A. 102-693, eff. 1-7-22; 102-1126, eff. 2-10-23.) 20    Section 10. The Associate Judges Act is amended by adding 21Section 2.6 as follows: 22    (705 ILCS 45/2.6 new)23    Sec. 2.6. Additional associate judge; 7th circuit. In 24addition to the number of associate judges authorized under   SB2784 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 16465 JRC 29858 b1Sections 2 and 2.1, there shall be one additional associate 2judge appointed in the 7th circuit. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.